src/import/adjectives.lexc
kandideeriv+A:kan,did´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kanduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´anduv MAGUS ;
kannatav+A:kannatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kantav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´antav MAGUS ;
karastav+A:karastav MAGUS ;
karistatav+A:karistatav MAGUS ;
karistav+A:karistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@karjuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´arjuv MAGUS ;
karvendav+A:karvendav MAGUS ;
kasutav+A:kasutav MAGUS ;
kasvatatav+A:kasvatatav MAGUS ;
kasvatav+A:kasvatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kasvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´asvav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@katkev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´atkev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kattuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´attuv MAGUS ;
kaubeldav+A:kaubeldav MAGUS ;
kaugenev+A:kaugenev MAGUS ;
kaunistav+A:kaunistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kauplev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´auplev MAGUS ;
kavandatav+A:kavandatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keelav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eelav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keelduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eelduv MAGUS ;
keelustav+A:keelustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eerduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eerlev MAGUS ;
keerutav+A:keerutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eev%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ehtiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ehv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´el,kiv MAGUS ;
kenitlev+A:kenitlev MAGUS ;
kergendav+A:kergendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kerjav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´erjav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kerkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´erkiv MAGUS ;
kestendav+A:kestendav MAGUS ;
ketendav+A:ketendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kiduv MAGUS ;
kihisev+A:kihisev MAGUS ;
kihutav+A:kihutav MAGUS ;
kiidetav+A:kiidetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiirgav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´iirgav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiirguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´iirguv MAGUS ;
kiirustav+A:kiirustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiiskav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´iiskav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiitlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´iitlev MAGUS ;
kikitav+A:kikitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kilav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kilav MAGUS ;
kilgendav+A:kilgendav MAGUS ;
kinnitav+A:kin,nitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kippuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ippuv MAGUS ;
kiratsev+A:kiratsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kirev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kirev MAGUS ;
kirjeldatav+A:kirjeldatav MAGUS ;
kirjeldav+A:kirjeldav MAGUS ;
kirjutav+A:kirjutav MAGUS ;
kisendav+A:kisendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiskuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´iskuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiunuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´iunuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiusav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´iusav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@klantsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kl´an,tsiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kleepuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kl´eepuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kloppiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kl´oppiv MAGUS ;
kobrutav+A:kobrutav MAGUS ;
kogunev+A:kogunev MAGUS ;
kogutav+A:kogutav MAGUS ;
kohaldatav+A:kohaldatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kohev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kohev MAGUS ;
kohisev+A:kohisev MAGUS ;
kohustav+A:kohustav MAGUS ;
kohutav+A:kohutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kohuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kohuv MAGUS ;
koketeeriv+A:koket´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kolksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´olksuv MAGUS ;
kollendav+A:kollendav MAGUS ;
konkureeriv+A:konkur´eeriv MAGUS ;
kontakteeruv+A:kontakt´eeruv MAGUS ;
kontrollitav+A:kontr`ol,litav MAGUS ;
kontrolliv+A:kontr´ol,liv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@koolev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´oolE2v MAGUS ;
koolitatav+A:kool,itatav MAGUS ;
koondatav+A:k´oondatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@koondav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´oondav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@koonduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´oonduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@koormav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´oormav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@koosnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´oosnev MAGUS ;
koostatav+A:k´oostatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kootav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ootav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@korduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´orduv MAGUS ;
korisev+A:korisev MAGUS ;
korraldatav+A:korraldatav MAGUS ;
korraldav+A:korraldav MAGUS ;
korrutatav+A:korrutatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kortsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ortsuv MAGUS ;
kosutav+A:kosutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kraaksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kr´aaksuv MAGUS ;
krabisev+A:krabisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kriiskav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kr´iiskav MAGUS ;
kritiseeritav+A:kritiseeritav MAGUS ;
kritiseeriv+A:kritis´eeriv MAGUS ;
krõbisev+A:krõbisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuhjuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uhjuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuivav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uivav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uiv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kujundav+A:kujundav MAGUS ;
kujunev+A:kujunev MAGUS ;
kujutav+A:kujutav MAGUS ;
kujuteldav+A:kujut´eldav MAGUS ;
kujutletav+A:kujutletav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kukkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ukkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kulgev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ulgev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kuluv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kumav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kumav MAGUS ;
kumerduv+A:kumerduv MAGUS ;
kumisev+A:kumisev MAGUS ;
kummastav+A:kummastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurnav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´urnav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kusev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kusev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kustuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ustuv MAGUS ;
kutsutav+A:kutsutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kutsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´utsuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uuldav MAGUS ;
kuulutav+A:kuulutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuuluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uuluv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuumav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uumav MAGUS ;
kõdunev+A:kõdunev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kõhklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´õhklev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kõikuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´õikuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kõlav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kõlav MAGUS ;
kõlisev+A:kõlisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kõndiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´õn,div MAGUS ;
kõnelev+A:kõnelev MAGUS ;
kõrgenev+A:kõrgenev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kõrguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´õrguv MAGUS ;
kõrvaldatav+A:kõrvaldatav MAGUS ;
kõrvetav+A:kõrvetav MAGUS ;
kähisev+A:kähisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@käibiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´äibiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@käidav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´äidav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@käiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´äiv MAGUS ;
käivituv+A:käivituv MAGUS ;
käratsev+A:käratsev MAGUS ;
kärisev+A:kärisev MAGUS ;
käsitletav+A:käsitletav MAGUS ;
käsitlev+A:käsitlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@käskiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´äs,kiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kääriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ääriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@köetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´öetav MAGUS ;
kükitav+A:kükitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@külgnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ül,gnev MAGUS ;
külmetav+A:külmetav MAGUS ;
küpsetav+A:küpsetav MAGUS ;
küsitav+A:küsitav MAGUS ;
küsitletav+A:küsitletav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@küsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@küsiv MAGUS ;
kütkestav+A:kütkestav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@küündiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´üündiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@küütlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´üütlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@laastav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´aastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@laekuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´aekuv MAGUS ;
laevatatav+A:laevatatav MAGUS ;
lagundav+A:lagundav MAGUS ;
lagunev+A:lagunev MAGUS ;
lahendatav+A:lahendatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lahknev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ahknev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lahkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ahkuv MAGUS ;
lahustuv+A:lahustuv MAGUS ;
lahutatav+A:lahutatav MAGUS ;
laidetav+A:laidetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@laimav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´aimav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@laiuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´aiuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lamav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lamav MAGUS ;
lammutav+A:lammutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@langev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´angev MAGUS ;
laristav+A:laristav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@laskuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´askuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lauldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´auldav MAGUS ;
laveeriv+A:lav´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lebav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lebav MAGUS ;
leegitsev+A:leegitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@leekiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´eekiv MAGUS ;
leemendav+A:leemendav MAGUS ;
leemetav+A:leemetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lehkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ehkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lehviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ehviv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@leiduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´eiduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lendav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´endav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@leppiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´eppiv MAGUS ;
levitatav+A:levitatav MAGUS ;
levitav+A:levitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@leviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@leviv MAGUS ;
libisev+A:libisev MAGUS ;
lidutav+A:lidutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lihav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@lihav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lihviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ihviv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@liialdav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@liialdav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@liibuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´iibuv MAGUS ;
liidetav+A:liidetav MAGUS ;
liigutav+A:liigutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@liikuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´iikuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@liipav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´iipav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@liituv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´iituv MAGUS ;
lipitsev+A:lipitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lirtsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´irtsuv MAGUS ;
